Utah statutes.
26-9f-104.   Duties and responsibilities.

The commission shall:

(1)  advise and make recommendations on digital health service issues to the department and other state entities;

(2)  advise and make recommendations on digital health service related patient privacy to the department;

(3)  promote collaborative efforts to establish technical compatibility, uniform policies, and privacy features to meet legal, financial, commercial, and other societal requirements;

(4)  identify, address, and seek to resolve the legal, ethical, regulatory, financial, medical, and technological issues that may serve as barriers to digital health service;

(5)  explore and encourage the development of digital health service systems as a means of reducing health care costs and increasing health care quality and access, with emphasis on assisting rural health care providers and special populations with access to or development of electronic medical records;

(6)  seek public input on digital health service issues; and

(7)  in consultation with the department, advise the governor and Legislature on:

(a)  the role of digital health service in the state;

(b)  the policy issues related to digital health service;

(c)  the changing digital health service needs and resources in the state; and

(d)  state budgetary matters related to digital health service.

